Washington statutes.
RCW 43.380.030

Council—Membership.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5139-S.SL) ***

(1) The council comprises fifteen members appointed by the governor.

(2) The governor must create a membership that includes:

(a)(i) Representatives of: The department of corrections; the juvenile rehabilitation administration; a statewide organization representing community and technical colleges; a statewide organization representing law enforcement interests; a statewide organization representing the interests of crime victims; a statewide organization representing prosecutors; a statewide organization representing public defenders; a statewide or local organization representing businesses and employers; housing providers; and faith-based organizations or communities;

(ii) At least two persons with experience reentering the community after incarceration; and

(iii) Two other community leaders.

(b) At least one position of the council must be reserved for an invited person with a background in tribal affairs, and such position has all of the same voting and other powers of other members.

(3) When making appointments, the governor shall consider:

(a) The racial and ethnic background of applicants in order for the membership to reflect the diversity of racial and ethnic backgrounds of all those who are incarcerated in the state;

(b) The gender of applicants in order for the membership to reflect the gender diversity of all those who are incarcerated in the state;

(c) The geographic location of all applicants in order for the membership to represent the different geographic regions of the state; and

(d) The experiences and background of all applicants relating to the incarcerated population.

[ 2016 c 188 s 4.]